Utah statutes.
23-21-2.4.   Procedure to revise a management plan.
(1)  Any person seeking a revision of a management plan may request the
regional advisory council in the region where the land is located to consider
the proposal to revise the plan.  The regional advisory council shall consider
the proposal and advise the division.
(2)  The process specified in Sections 23-21-2.2 and 23-21-2.3 shall be used
to revise a management plan.
